Oklahoma, session 2025, SB802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1332 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No person or entity in this state shall manufacture, sell,


or deliver, hold, or offer for sale any food that contains a vaccine


or vaccine material.


B. As used in this section, “vaccine or vaccine material” means


a substance intended for use in humans to stimulate the production


of antibodies and provide immunity against disease, prepared from


the causative agent of a disease, its products, or a synthetic


substitute, treated to act as an antigen without inducing the


disease, that is authorized or approved by the United States Food


and Drug Administration.

Req. No. 132 Page 1


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-132 DC 1/19/2025 5:43:37 AM





































Req. No. 132 Page 2